Maine, session 132, LD1974.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Parents joint natural guardians; fundamental right
1. Parents joint natural guardians of children. Parents are the joint natural
guardians of their minor children and are jointly entitled to the care, custody, control and
services of their children. Neither parent has any rights paramount to the rights of the other
with reference to any matter affecting their children.
2. Fundamental right. The liberty of a parent to direct the upbringing, education and
care of the parent's child is a fundamental right.
3. Construction. This section may not be construed to affect the decision of a court
regarding parental rights and responsibilities or the termination of parental rights.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4003-A is enacted to read:
§4003-A. Parents joint natural guardians; fundamental right
1. Parents joint natural guardians of children. Parents are the joint natural
guardians of their minor children and are jointly entitled to the care, custody, control and
services of their children. Neither parent has any rights paramount to the rights of the other
with reference to any matter affecting their children.
2. Fundamental right. The liberty of a parent to direct the upbringing, education and
care of the parent's child is a fundamental right.
3. Construction. This section may not be construed to affect the decision of a court
regarding parental rights and responsibilities or the termination of parental rights.